Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.300

Boundary line adjustment—Purpose—Definition.

The purpose of RCW 35.13.300 through 35.13.330 is to establish a process for the adjustment of existing or proposed city boundary lines to avoid a situation where a common boundary line is or would be located within a right-of-way of a public street, road, or highway, or a situation where two cities are separated or would be separated by only the right-of-way of a public street, road, or highway, other than situations where a boundary line runs from one edge of the right-of-way to the other edge of the right-of-way.

As used in RCW 35.13.300 through 35.13.330, "city" includes every city or town in the state, including a code city operating under Title 35A RCW.

[ 1989 c 84 s 12.]